apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
	 <pardef n="बोल__vblex_tv">
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाला</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाले</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ना</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ने</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>कर</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>के</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="बढ"><i>बढ़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="घूम"><i>घूम</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गुजार"><i>गुजार</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तलाश"><i>तलाश</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="उबल"><i>उबल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="शुरू"><i>शुरू</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="क्लिक"><i>क्लिक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="क्लिक"><i>क्लिक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तोड़"><i>तोड़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="लहरा"><i>लहरा</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चाह"><i>चाह</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भर"><i>भर</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खोज"><i>खोज</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पढ़"><i>पढ़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खेल"><i>खेल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="देख"><i>देख</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ढूॅंड"><i>ढूॅंड</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="सुन"><i>सुन</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="जान"><i>जान</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="सोच"><i>सोच</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="गिन"><i>गिन</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="भेज"><i>भेज</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="चुक"><i>चुक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="मिल"><i>मिल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="पूछ"><i>पूछ</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बन"><i>बन</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="लिख"><i>लिख</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बोल"><i>बोल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रक्षेपित"><i>प्रक्षेपित</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पहुँच"><i>पहुँच</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ढक"><i>ढक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कह"><i>कह</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कर"><i>कर</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="अलाप"><i>अलाप</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आंक"><i>आंक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कतर"><i>कतर</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कस"><i>कस</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="काट"><i>काट</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कात"><i>कात</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कुचल"><i>कुचल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कुतर"><i>कुतर</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खरीद"><i>खरीद</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खींच"><i>खींच</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खुरच"><i>खुरच</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खे"><i>खे</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खोद"><i>खोद</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खोल"><i>खोल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खौल"><i>खौल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गढ़"><i>गढ़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गाड़"><i>गाड़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गूंध"><i>गूंध</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="घसीट"><i>घसीट</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="घिस"><i>घिस</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="घूर"><i>घूर</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="घेर"><i>घेर</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="घोल"><i>घोल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चख"><i>चख</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चर"><i>चर</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चाट"><i>चाट</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चीर"><i>चीर</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चुग"><i>चुग</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चुन"><i>चुन</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चुपड़"><i>चुपड़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चूम"><i>चूम</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चूस"><i>चूस</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छांट"><i>छांट</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छान"><i>छान</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छाप"><i>छाप</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छिड़क"><i>छिड़क</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छीन"><i>छीन</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छील"><i>छील</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छू"><i>छू</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छेद"><i>छेद</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छोड़"><i>छोड़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जकड़"><i>जकड़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जांच"><i>जांच</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जीत"><i>जीत</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जी"><i>जी</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जोड़"><i>जोड़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जोत"><i>जोत</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="झटक"><i>झटक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="झाड़"><i>झाड़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="झेल"><i>झेल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="टटोल"><i>टटोल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="टांक"><i>टांक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="टांग"><i>टांग</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="टाल"><i>टाल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="टोक"><i>टोक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ठग"><i>ठग</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ठोंक"><i>ठोंक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="डस"><i>डस</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="डाल"><i>डाल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ढकेल"><i>ढकेल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ताक"><i>ताक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तैर"><i>तैर</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दुह"><i>दुह</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दे"><i>दे</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धकेल"><i>धकेल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धधक"><i>धधक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धर"><i>धर</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धुन"><i>धुन</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="नाप"><i>नाप</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निगल"><i>निगल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निचोड़"><i>निचोड़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निथार"><i>निथार</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निबाह"><i>निबाह</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पछाड़"><i>पछाड़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पटक"><i>पटक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="परख"><i>परख</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पहचान"><i>पहचान</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पहन"><i>पहन</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पाल"><i>पाल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पीट"><i>पीट</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पी"><i>पी</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पीस"><i>पीस</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पुकार"><i>पुकार</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पुचकार"><i>पुचकार</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पूज"><i>पूज</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पोत"><i>पोत</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फटक"><i>फटक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फड़क"><i>फड़क</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फाड़"><i>फाड़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फेंक"><i>फेंक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फैल"><i>फैल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बक"><i>बक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बांध"><i>बांध</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बिगाड़"><i>बिगाड़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बीन"><i>बीन</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बेच"><i>बेच</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मरोड़"><i>मरोड़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मांग"><i>मांग</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मार"><i>मार</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="रट"><i>रट</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="संवार"><i>संवार</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सींच"><i>सींच</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सी"><i>सी</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सौंप"><i>सौंप</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="हांक"><i>हांक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="उठ"><i>उठ</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मांग"><i>मांग</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पी"><i>पी</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ढ़ूँढ़"><i>ढ़ूँढ़</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दे"><i>दे</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कल्प"><i>कल्प</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दे"><i>दे</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पाल"><i>पाल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छोड"><i>छोड</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="रोक"><i>रोक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दे"><i>दे</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="समझ"><i>समझ</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
